Utah statutes.
53A-15-1213.   State Board of Education -- Rulemaking.

The State Board of Education shall make rules in accordance with this part and Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, that:

(1)  establish a course credit acknowledgement form and procedures for completing and submitting to the State Board of Education a course credit acknowledgement; and

(2)  establish procedures for the administration of a statewide assessment to a student enrolled in an online course.

